zh-TW: 食物、飲料和菸草 > 飲料: 酒精飲料; 酪乳; 咖啡; 香甜酒、糖漿和蘇打; 水果風味飲品; 熱巧克力; 果汁、奶昔和果昔; 低酒精和無酒精飲品; 牛奶; 植物奶; 沖泡式飲品; 碳酸飲料; 運動/能量飲料; 茶類飲品; 含醋飲料; 水
lt-LT: Maistas, gėrimai ir tabakas > Gėrimai: Alkoholiniai gėrimai; Pasukos; Kava; Sirupai ir sulčių gėrimai; Vaisių skonio gėrimai; Karštas Šokoladas; Sultys, pieno kokteiliai ir glotnučiai; Mažai alkoholio turintys ir nealkoholiniai gėrimai; Pienas; Augalinis pienas; Miltelių pavidalo gėrimų mišiniai; Gazuotas vanduo; Sportiniai ir energiniai gėrimai; Arbata ir užpilai; Acto gėrimai; Vanduo
pl: Żywność, napoje i tytoń > Napoje: Napoje alkoholowe; Maślanki; Kawa; Syropy i koncentraty; Napoje o smaku owocowym; Gorąca czekolada; Soki, koktajle mleczne i smoothie; Napoje o niskiej zawartości alkoholu i napoje bezalkoholowe; Mleko; Mleko roślinne; Mieszanki napojów w proszku; Napoje gazowane; Napoje izotoniczne i energetyzujące; Herbaty i napary; Napoje na bazie octu; Woda
hu: Élelmiszerek, italok és dohányáru > Italok: Alkoholos italok; Író; Kávé; Likőrök, szirupok és koncentrátumok; Gyümölcsízű italok; Forró csokoládé; Gyümölcslevek, tejshakek és turmixok; Alacsony alkoholtartalmú és alkoholmentes italok; Tej; Növényi alapú tej; Por alakú italkeverékek; Szóda; Sport- és energiaitalok; Tea és infúziók; Ecetes italok; Víz
bg-BG: Храна, напитки и тютюневи изделия > Напитки: Алкохолни напитки; Мътеница; Кафе; Ликьори, сиропи и концентрирани сокове; Напитки с плодов вкус; Горещ шоколад; Сокове, млечни шейкове и смутита; Нискоалкохолни и безалкохолни напитки; Мляко; Мляко без лактоза; Прахообразни смеси за напитки; Сода; Спортни и енергийни напитки; Чай и запарки; Напитки с оцет; Вода
en: Food, Beverages & Tobacco > Beverages: Alcoholic Beverages; Buttermilk; Coffee; Cordials, Syrups & Squash; Fruit Flavored Drinks; Hot Chocolate; Juices, Milkshakes & Smoothies; Low Alcohol & Alcohol-Free Beverages; Milk; Non-Dairy Milk; Powdered Beverage Mixes; Soda; Sports & Energy Drinks; Tea & Infusions; Vinegar Drinks; Water
ro-RO: Alimente, băuturi și tutun > Băuturi: Băuturi alcoolice; Lapte bătut; Cafea; Tonice, siropuri și squash; Băuturi cu aromă de fructe; Ciocolată caldă; Sucuri, milkshake-uri și smoothie-uri; Băuturi cu conținut scăzut de alcool și fără alcool; Lapte; Lapte vegetal; Amestecuri pentru băuturi sub formă de pudră; Sifon; Băuturi pentru sport și energizante; Ceai și infuzii; Băuturi cu oțet; Apă
it: Cibo, bevande e tabacco > Bevande: Bevande alcoliche; Latticello; Caffè; Cordiali, sciroppi e spremute; Bevande al sapore di frutta; Cioccolata calda; Succhi, frappè e frullati; Bevande a basso contenuto di alcol e analcoliche; Latte; Latte vegetale; Miscele bevande; Bibite gassate; Energy drink e bevande per lo sport; Tè e infusi; Bevande a base di aceto; Acqua
de: Nahrungsmittel, Getränke & Tabak > Getränke: Alkoholische Getränke; Buttermilch; Kaffee; Liköre, Sirupe und Fruchtsaftkonzentrate; Getränke mit Fruchtgeschmack; Kakao; Säfte, Milchshakes und Smoothies; Alkoholarme und alkoholfreie Getränke; Milch; Nicht-tierische Milch; Getränkepulver; Limonaden; Sportgetränke & Energy Drinks; Tees & Aufgüsse; Essighaltige Getränke; Wasser
nb: Mat, drikkevarer og tobakk > Drikkevarer: Alkoholholdige drikkevarer; Kjernemelk; Kaffe; Cordials, sirup og squash; Drikkevarer med fruktsmak; Varm sjokolade; Juicer, milkshaker og smoothier; Lavalkohols- og alkoholfrie drikkevarer; Melk; Melkefri melk; Drikkeblandinger i pulverform; Brus; Sports- og energidrikker; Te og infusjoner; Eddikdrikker; Vann
th: อาหาร เครื่องดื่ม และยาสูบ > เครื่องดื่ม: เครื่องดื่มที่มีแอลกอฮอล์; นมเปรี้ยว; กาแฟ; น้ำเชื่อมผลไม้เข้มข้น ไซรัป และสควอช; เครื่องดื่มรสผลไม้; ช็อกโกเลตร้อน; น้ำผลไม้ มิลค์เชค และสมูทตี้; เครื่องดื่มแอลกอฮอล์ต่ำและเครื่องดื่มปราศจากแอลกอฮอล์; นม; นมที่ได้จากพืช; ส่วนผสมเครื่องดื่มแบบผง; น้ำอัดลม; เครื่องดื่มเพิ่มกำลังและสำหรับกีฬา; ชาและชาสมุนไพร; เครื่องดื่มจากน้ำส้มสายชู; น้ำ
pt-PT: Comida, bebidas e tabaco > Bebidas: Bebidas alcoólicas; Leitelho; Café; Licores, xaropes e sumos concentrados; Bebidas com sabor a fruta; Chocolate quente; Sumos, batidos e smoothies; Bebidas com baixo teor de álcool e sem álcool; Leite; Leite não lácteo; Misturas de bebidas em pó; Soda; Bebidas desportivas e energéticas; Chá e infusões; Bebidas de vinagre; Água
fr: Alimentation, boissons et tabac > Boissons: Boissons alcoolisées; Babeurre; Café; Cordiaux et sirops; Boissons aromatisées aux fruits; Chocolat chaud; Jus, milk-shakes et smoothies; Boissons à faible teneur en alcool et sans alcool; Lait; Lait sans produits laitiers; Mélanges pour boissons en poudre; Soda; Boissons énergisantes et pour le sport; Thé et infusions; Boissons au vinaigre; Eau
vi: Thực phẩm, đồ uống và thuốc lá > Đồ uống: Đồ uống có cồn; Sữa lên men; Cà phê; Rượu mùi, Xi-rô & Nước ép; Đồ uống hương vị trái cây; Sô cô la nóng; Nước ép, Sữa lắc & Sinh tố; Đồ uống ít cồn và không cồn; Sữa; Sữa hạt; Bột pha đồ uống; Soda; Đồ uống thể thao và đồ uống năng lượng; Trà và đồ uống từ trà; Giấm hoa quả; Nước
ko: 식품/음료/담배 > 음료: 주류; 버터밀크; 커피; 코디얼/시럽/스쿼시; 과일맛 음료; 핫초코; 주스/밀크셰이크/스무디; 저알코올/무알코올 음료; 우유; 우유 대체품; 분말형 음료 믹스; 탄산 음료; 스포츠/에너지 드링크; 차; 식초 음료; 물
pt-BR: Alimentos, bebidas e tabaco > Bebidas: Bebidas alcóolicas; Leite de manteiga; Café; Cordiais, xaropes e purês; Bebidas com sabor de frutas; Chocolate quente; Sucos, milkshakes e smoothies; Bebidas com baixo teor de álcool e sem álcool; Leite; Leite à base de plantas; Misturas para bebidas; Refrigerante; Bebidas energéticas e para prática esportiva; Chás e infusões; Bebidas a base de vinagre; Água
sl-SI: Hrana, pijača in tobak > Pijače: Alkoholne pijače; Pinjenec; Kava; Sadne esence, sirupi in sadni koncentrati; Pijače z okusom sadja; Vroča čokolada; Sokovi, mlečni napitki in smutiji; Pijače z nizko vsebnostjo alkohola in brezalkoholne pijače; Mleko; Rastlinsko mleko; Mešanice pijač v prahu; Gazirana pijača; Športne in energijske pijače; Čaj in poparki; Pijače s kisom; Voda
nl: Eten, drinken en tabak > Drinken: Alcoholische dranken; Karnemelk; Koffie; Cordials, stropen en squash; Dranken met fruitsmaak; Warme chocolademelk; Sappen, milkshakes en smoothies; Alcoholarme en alcoholvrije dranken; Melk; Plantaardige melk; Oploslimonades; Priklimonade; Sport- en energiedranken; Thee en aftreksels; Drinkazijnen; Water
da: Fødevarer, drikkevarer og tobak > Drikkevarer: Alkoholiske drikke; Kærnemælk; Kaffe; Sirupper og squash; Drikkevarer med frugtsmag; Varm chokolade; Juice, milkshakes og smoothies; Alkohol-lette og alkoholfri drikkevarer; Mælk; Mælk uden mælkeprodukter; Drinksmiksere; Sodavand; Sports- og energidrikke; Te og blandinger; Eddikebaserede drikkevarer; Vand
fi: Ruoka, juoma ja tupakkatuotteet > Juomat: Alkoholijuomat; Piimä; Kahvi; Mehutiivisteet ja siirapit; Hedelmäjuomat; Kaakao; Mehut, pirtelöt ja smoothiet; Vähäalkoholiset ja alkoholittomat juomat; Maito; Kasvimaidot; Juomasekoitejauheet; Limsa; Urheilu- ja energiajuomat; Tee- ja haudutettavat juomat; Etikkajuomat; Vesi
cs: Jídlo, pití a tabák > Nápoje: Alkoholické nápoje; Podmáslí; Káva; Kordiály, sirupy a squashe; Nápoje s ovocnou příchutí; Horká čokoláda; Džusy, mléčné koktejly a smoothie; Nápoje s nízkým obsahem alkoholu a bez alkoholu; Mléko; Rostlinné mléko; Instantní nápoje; Nealko; Iontové a energetické nápoje; Čaje a bylinné směsi; Octové nápoje; Voda
sv: Mat, dryck och tobak > Drycker: Alkoholhaltiga drycker; Kärnmjölk; Kaffe; Saft, sirap och squash; Drycker med fruktsmak; Varm choklad; Juice, milkshakes och smoothies; Lågalkoholhaltigt och alkoholfria drycker; Mjölk; Laktosfri mjölk; Dryckesmixar i pulverform; Läsk; Sportdrycker och energidrycker; Te och infusioner; Vinägerdrycker; Vatten
es: Alimentación, bebida y tabaco > Bebidas: Bebidas alcohólicas; Suero de mantequilla; Café; Siropes y bebidas a base de sirope; Bebidas de sabores de frutas; Chocolate caliente; Zumos, batidos y batidos de fruta; Bebidas bajas en alcohol y sin alcohol; Leche; Leche vegetal; Bebidas mezcladas; Gaseosa; Bebidas isotónicas y energéticas; Té e infusiones; Bebidas de vinagre; Agua
ja: 食品・飲料 > 飲料: アルコール飲料; バターミルク; コーヒー; コーディアル、シロップ、スカッシュ; フルーツフレーバー飲料; ココア; ジュース、ミルクシェイク、スムージー; 低アルコール・ノンアルコール飲料; ミルク; 植物性ミルク; ドリンクミックス; 炭酸飲料; スポーツドリンク・栄養ドリンク; お茶・紅茶; お酢飲料; 水
el: Τρόφιμα, ποτά & προϊόντα καπνού > Ποτά: Αλκοολούχα ποτά; Ξινόγαλα; Καφές; Λικέρ, σιρόπια & συμπυκνωμένοι χυμοί; Ποτά με γεύσεις φρούτων; Ζεστή σοκολάτα; Χυμοί, Milkshakes & Smoothies; Ποτά χαμηλής περιεκτικότητας σε αλκοόλ & χωρίς αλκοόλ; Γάλα; Μη γαλακτοκομικό γάλα; Μείγματα ποτών σε σκόνη; Αναψυκτικά; Αθλητικά & ενεργειακά ποτά; Τσάι & αφεψήματα; Ποτά με ξύδι; Νερό
ru: Продукты, напитки и табачные изделия > Напитки: Алкогольные напитки; Пахта; Кофе; Кордиалы и сиропы; Ароматизированные фруктовые напитки; Горячий шоколад; Соки, молочные коктейли и смузи; Слабоалкогольные и безалкогольные напитки; Молоко; Растительное молоко; Порошковые смеси для приготовления напитков; Газировки; Изотонические и энергетические напитки; Чай и травяные настои; Напитки с уксусом; Вода
hr-HR: Hrana, piće i duhan > Pića: Alkoholna pića; Mlaćenica; Kava; Sirupi i sokovi za razrjeđivanje; Voćni sokovi; Vruća čokolada; Sokovi, milkshake i smoothieji; Niskoalkoholna i bezalkoholna pića; Mlijeko; Biljno mlijeko; Praškaste mješavine za napitke; Gazirana pića; Sportska i energetska pića; Čaj i infuzije; Octena pića; Voda
tr: Yiyecek, İçecekler ve Tütün Mamülleri > Alkollü ve Alkolsüz İçecekler: Alkollü İçecekler; Yayık Ayranı; Kahve; Şuruplar ve Kabak; Meyve Aromalı İçecekler; Sıcak Çikolata; Meyve Suları, Milkshakeler ve Smoothieler; Düşük Alkollü ve Alkolsüz İçecekler; Süt; Hayvansal Ürün İçermeyen Süt; İçecek Karışımları; Gazlı İçecek; Spor ve Enerji İçecekleri; Çaylar ve Demleme İçecekler; Sirkeli İçecekler; Su
zh-CN: 饮食/烟酒 > 饮料/饮品: 酒精饮料; 脱脂乳; 咖啡; 甜酒、糖浆和南瓜; 果味饮料; 热巧/可可饮料; 果汁、奶昔和冰沙; 低酒精和无酒精饮料; 牛奶; 非乳制奶类; 冲泡饮料粉; 苏打水; 运动/能量饮料; 茶饮品; 醋饮料; 饮用水/纯净水
sk-SK: Potraviny, nápoje a tabakové výrobky > Nápoje: Alkoholické nápoje; Cmar; Káva; Ovocné džúsy, sirupy a šťavy; Nápoje s ovocnou príchuťou; Horúca čokoláda; Šťavy, mliečne koktaily a smoothies; Nápoje s nízkym obsahom alkoholu a nealkoholické nápoje; Mlieko; Rastlinné mlieko; Nápojové zmesi v prášku; Sóda; Športové a energetické nápoje; Čaje a odvary; Nápoje s octom; Voda